Connecticut, session 2026, HB05496.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this
section and section 2 of this act:
(1) "Employer" means a (A) municipal utility furnishing electric, gas
or water, (B) regional water authority, (C) regional sewer district, (D)
public service company, or (E) municipal public works department;
(2) "Public service company" has the same meaning as provided in
section 16-1 of the general statutes; and
(3) "Workplace violence" means any act or threat of physical violence,
harassment, intimidation or other threatening disruptive behavior that
occurs at a work site. "Workplace violence" does not include any such
act or threat that occurs at the site of an employer.
(b) On or before January 1, 2027, each employer shall undertake a risk
assessment of the factors that may place employees who provide
services directly to customers at risk of being a victim of workplace
violence by virtue of their role as an employee of such employer,
including, but not limited to, (1) working directly with customers in
their domicile, (2) working late nights or early morning hours, (3)
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5496
exchanging money with customers, (4) working alone or in small
numbers, (5) customers with a previous history of violence toward
employees, and (6) the crime rate for the municipality in which the
employee will provide services, as determined by the most recent
annual report concerning crime in the state issued by the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection pursuant to section 29-1c of
the general statutes.
(c) On or before July 1, 2027, each employer shall develop and
implement a workplace violence prevention and response training
program for employees who provide services directly to customers.
Such training program shall include, but need not be limited to, training
on (1) the risk factors identified pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
(2) methods the employer will use to prevent incidents of workplace
violence, including, but not limited to, (A) utilizing methods to
minimize the amount of cash on an employee's person during a work
shift, and (B) establishing and implementing reporting systems for
incidents of violent or aggressive behavior, (3) conflict resolution and
nonviolent self-defense responses, and (4) measures employees can take
to protect themselves from such risks. Such training program shall be
provided to an employee upon hire and annually thereafter.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Each employer shall maintain
records that detail each incidence of workplace violence and include the
specific location in which such incident occurred. An employer shall,
not later than January first of each year, submit a report to the Labor
Department regarding the number of workplace violence incidents that
occurred during the preceding calendar year and the specific location
where such incidents occurred.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5496
LAB Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3